Massachusetts, session 194th, H1034.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 6B the following section:–
Section 6C. (a) As used in this section the following terms shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Food establishment”, an operation that stores, prepares, packages, serves, vends, or
otherwise provides food for human consumption, including but not limited to any establishment
requiring a permit to operate in accordance with the State Food Code.
“Single-use plastic straw”, a single-use, disposable tube made predominantly of plastic
derived from either petroleum or a biologically based polymer, such as corn or other plant
of 2

sources, used to transfer a beverage from a container to the mouth of the person drinking the
beverage. “Single-use plastic straw” shall not include a straw made from non-plastic materials,
including, but not limited to, paper, pasta, sugar cane, wood, or bamboo.
(b) A food establishment shall not provide a single-use plastic straw to a customer unless
requested by the customer.
(c) The relevant licensing authority applicable to the food establishment may enforce the
provisions of this section for a first violation of this section by providing a written warning and
for a second or subsequent violation a fine of $25 for each day food establishment is in violation,
but not to exceed $300 annually.
of 2